North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-15 Tax Levies and Limitations
57-15-12.1.
City or park district tax funding for forestry activities.

The governing body of a city or park district may provide funding from revenues derived from its general fund levy authority for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of forestry activities within the city or park district. The proceeds of any funding under this section may be used for forestry activities, including prevention or control of Dutch elm disease or other diseases which may affect trees, shrubs, and other vegetation; purchasing, planting, or removal of trees, shrubs, and other vegetation; pruning and maintenance of trees, shrubs, and other vegetation; purchasing of necessary equipment; hiring of personnel; contracting for services; public information and technical assistance; and other items related to forestry activities which may be necessary to provide for proper care, maintenance, propagation, and improvement of forestry resources within the city or park district.

In lieu of funding from revenues derived from general fund levy authority as described in subsection 1, a city or park district may propose a service charge as an alternative form of financing. Such alternative form of financing must be approved by a majority vote of the qualified electors voting on the question at any citywide or districtwide election. The proceeds of any service charge may be used for forestry activities, as specified in subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 591, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 51; 1989, ch. 698, § 1; 1997, ch. 108, § 36; 2001, ch. 510, § 7; 2015, ch. 439, § 76, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-12.2.
Exceptions to tax levy limitations for park districts. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 606, § 57; 1987, ch. 678, § 2; 1989, ch. 494, § 2; 1997, ch. 356, § 3; 2001, ch. 510, § 8; Repealed by 2015, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-12.3.
Park district levy for land acquisition and development of recreational facilities.

In addition to its general fund levy authority, a board of park commissioners established pursuant to chapter 40-49 may levy taxes annually not exceeding five mills per dollar of taxable valuation in the district for a fund for the purpose of acquiring real estate as a site for public parks, construction of recreational facilities, renovation and repair of recreational facilities, and the furnishing of recreational facilities. The tax is to be levied, spread, and collected in the same manner as are other taxes in the park district. The question of whether the levy is to be discontinued must be submitted to the qualified electors at the next regular election upon petition of twenty-five percent or more of the qualified electors voting in the last regular park district election, if the petition is filed not less than sixty days before the election. If the majority of the qualified electors voting on the question vote to discontinue the levy, it may not again be levied without a majority vote of the qualified electors voting on the question at a later regular election on the question of relevying the tax, which question may be submitted upon petition as above provided or by decision of the governing board.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 678, § 1; 1997, ch. 108, § 37; 2001, ch. 510, § 9; 2015, ch. 439, § 77, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-13.
School district tax levies.

School district taxes must be levied by the governing body of each school district on or before the tenth day of August of each year. The governing body of the school district may increase or decrease its tax levy and budget for the current fiscal year on or before the tenth day of October of each year but the certification must be filed with the county auditor within the time limitations under section 57-15-31.1. Taxes for school district purposes must be based upon an itemized budget statement which must show the complete expenditure program of the district for the current fiscal year and the sources of the revenue from which it is to be financed. The school board of each public school district, in levying taxes, is limited by the amount necessary to be raised for the purpose of meeting the appropriations included in the school budget of the current fiscal year, and the sum necessary to be provided as an interim fund, together with a tax sufficient in amount to pay the interest on the bonded debt of the district and to provide a sinking fund to pay and discharge the principal thereof at maturity.

Source:

S.L. 1890, ch. 62, § 185; R.C. 1895, § 801; R.C. 1899, § 801; R.C. 1905, § 964; S.L. 1911, ch. 266, § 151; C.L. 1913, § 1258; S.L. 1915, ch. 144, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 1258; S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 7; 1931, ch. 297, § 2; 1943, ch. 258, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-1513; S.L. 1961, ch. 158, § 86; 1989, ch. 211, § 2; 1997, ch. 175, § 6; 2017, ch. 411, § 22, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017; 2019, ch. 481, § 1, eff for taxable years through December 31, 2018.

Cross-References.

Recreation system, levy for, see N.D.C.C. § 40-55-09.

57-15-14.
Voter approval of excess levies in school districts.

Unless authorized by the electors of the school district in accordance with this section, a school district may not impose greater levies than those permitted under section 57-15-14.2.

In any school district having a total population in excess of four thousand according to the last federal decennial census there may be levied any specific number of mills that upon resolution of the school board has been submitted to and approved by a majority of the qualified electors voting upon the question at any regular or special school district election.

In any school district having a total population of fewer than four thousand, there may be levied any specific number of mills that upon resolution of the school board has been approved by fifty-five percent of the qualified electors voting upon the question at any regular or special school election.

After June 30, 2009, in any school district election for approval by electors of increased levy authority under subsection 1 or 2, the ballot must specify the number of mills proposed for approval, and the number of taxable years for which that approval is to apply. After June 30, 2009, approval by electors of increased levy authority under subsection 1 or 2 may not be effective for more than ten taxable years.

The authority for a levy of up to a specific number of mills under this section approved by electors of a school district before July 1, 2009, is terminated effective for taxable years after 2015. If the electors of a school district subject to this subsection have not approved a levy for taxable years after 2015 of up to a specific number of mills under this section by December 31, 2015, the school district levy limitation for subsequent years is subject to the limitations under section 57-15-01.1 or this section.

For taxable years beginning after 2012:

The authority for a levy of up to a specific number of mills, approved by electors of a school district for any period of time that includes a taxable year before 2009, must be reduced by one hundred fifteen mills as a precondition of receiving state aid in accordance with chapter 15.1-27.

The authority for a levy of up to a specific number of mills, approved by electors of a school district for any period of time that does not include a taxable year before 2009, must be reduced by forty mills as a precondition of receiving state aid in accordance with chapter 15.1-27.

The authority for a levy of up to a specific number of mills, placed on the ballot in a school district election for electoral approval of increased levy authority under subdivision a or b, after June 30, 2013, must be stated as a specific number of mills of general fund levy authority and must include a statement that the statutory school district general fund levy limitation is seventy mills on the dollar of the taxable valuation of the school district.

The authority for an unlimited levy approved by electors of a school district before July 1, 2009, is terminated effective for taxable years after 2015. If the electors of a school district subject to this subsection have not approved a levy of up to a specific number of mills under this section by December 31, 2015, the school district levy limitation for subsequent years is subject to the limitations under section 57-15-01.1 or this section.

The question of authorizing or discontinuing such specific number of mills authority in any school district must be submitted to the qualified electors at the next regular election upon resolution of the school board or upon the filing with the school board of a petition containing the signatures of qualified electors of the district equal in number to ten percent of the number of electors who cast votes in the most recent election in the school district. No fewer than twenty-five signatures are required.

The approval of discontinuing such authority does not affect the tax levy in the calendar year in which the election is held.

The election must be held in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as provided in this section for the first election upon the question of authorizing the mill levy.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 7; 1931, ch. 297, § 2; 1943, ch. 258, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-1514; S.L. 1947, ch. 359, § 1; 1951, ch. 137, § 10; 1953, ch. 315, § 3; 1955, ch. 142, § 3; 1957, ch. 354, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 57-1514; S.L. 1959, ch. 170, § 17; 1961, ch. 158, § 87; 1965, ch. 395, § 1; 1967, ch. 429, § 1; 1969, ch. 485, § 1; 1971, ch. 158, § 23; 1971, ch. 542, § 1; 1975, ch. 131, § 10; 1977, ch. 519, § 1; 1983, ch. 202, § 2; 1983, ch. 591, § 4; 1983, ch. 593, § 52; 1983, ch. 607, § 1; 1983, ch. 608, § 15; 1985, ch. 235, § 98; 1985, ch. 617, § 1; 1987, ch. 232, § 6; 1995, ch. 193, § 8; 2001, ch. 161, § 31; 2007, ch. 520, § 3; 2007, ch. 163, § 47; 2009, ch. 175, § 47; 2009, ch. 535, § 2; 2013, ch. 13, § 48; 2015, ch. 137, § 21, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Debt void if entailing tax beyond legal rate, see N.D.C.C. § 57-45-07.

High school students meals and lodging, see N.D.C.C. § 15.1-30-04.

57-15-14.1.
Levies for support of county agricultural and training schools. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 211, § 3.

57-15-14.2.
School district levies. [Effective for taxable years through December 31, 2024]

The board of a school district may levy a tax not exceeding the amount in dollars that the school district levied for the prior year, plus twelve percent and the dollar amount of the adjustment required in section 15.1-27-04.3, up to a levy of seventy mills on the taxable valuation of the district, for any purpose related to the provision of educational services. The proceeds of this levy must be deposited into the school district’s general fund and used in accordance with this subsection. The proceeds may not be transferred into any other fund.

The board of a school district may levy no more than twelve mills on the taxable valuation of the district, for miscellaneous purposes and expenses. The proceeds of this levy must be deposited into a special fund known as the miscellaneous fund and used in accordance with this subsection. The proceeds may not be transferred into any other fund.

The board of a school district may levy no more than three mills on the taxable valuation of the district for deposit into a special reserve fund, in accordance with chapter 57-19.

The board of a school district may levy no more than the number of mills necessary, on the taxable valuation of the district, for the payment of tuition, in accordance with section 15.1-29-15. The proceeds of this levy must be deposited into a special fund known as the tuition fund and used in accordance with this subsection. The proceeds may not be transferred into any other fund.

The board of a school district may levy no more than five mills on the taxable valuation of the district, pursuant to section 57-15-15.1, for purposes of developing a school safety plan in accordance with section 15.1-09-60. The proceeds of this levy must be deposited into a special fund known as the school safety plan fund and used in accordance with this subsection.

Nothing in this section limits the board of a school district from levying:

Mills for a building fund, as permitted in sections 15.1-09-49 and 57-15-16; and

Mills necessary to pay principal and interest on the bonded debt of the district, including the mills necessary to pay principal and interest on any bonded debt incurred under section 57-15-17.1 before July 1, 2013.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 591, § 2; 1983, ch. 608, § 17; 1985, ch. 618, § 1; 1987, ch. 228, § 2; 1987, ch. 232, § 7; 1989, ch. 2, § 15; 1993, ch. 549, § 1; 1999, ch. 169, § 10; 1999, ch. 500, § 1; 2001, ch. 161, § 32; 2003, ch. 138, § 100; 2013, ch. 13, § 49; 2015, ch. 137, § 22, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 149, § 17, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018; 2019, ch. 482, § 3, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018.

57-15-14.2.
School district levies. [Effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024]

The board of a school district may levy a tax not exceeding the amount in dollars that the school district levied for the prior year, plus twelve percent, up to a levy of seventy mills on the taxable valuation of the district, for any purpose related to the provision of educational services. The proceeds of this levy must be deposited into the school district’s general fund and used in accordance with this subsection. The proceeds may not be transferred into any other fund.

The board of a school district may levy no more than twelve mills on the taxable valuation of the district, for miscellaneous purposes and expenses. The proceeds of this levy must be deposited into a special fund known as the miscellaneous fund and used in accordance with this subsection. The proceeds may not be transferred into any other fund.

The board of a school district may levy no more than three mills on the taxable valuation of the district for deposit into a special reserve fund, in accordance with chapter 57-19.

The board of a school district may levy no more than the number of mills necessary, on the taxable valuation of the district, for the payment of tuition, in accordance with section 15.1-29-15. The proceeds of this levy must be deposited into a special fund known as the tuition fund and used in accordance with this subsection. The proceeds may not be transferred into any other fund.

The board of a school district may levy no more than five mills on the taxable valuation of the district, pursuant to section 57-15-15.1, for purposes of developing a school safety plan in accordance with section 15.1-09-60. The proceeds of this levy must be deposited into a special fund known as the school safety plan fund and used in accordance with this subsection.

Nothing in this section limits the board of a school district from levying:

Mills for a building fund, as permitted in sections 15.1-09-49 and 57-15-16; and

Mills necessary to pay principal and interest on the bonded debt of the district, including the mills necessary to pay principal and interest on any bonded debt incurred under section 57-15-17.1 before July 1, 2013.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 591, § 2; 1983, ch. 608, § 17; 1985, ch. 618, § 1; 1987, ch. 228, § 2; 1987, ch. 232, § 7; 1989, ch. 2, § 15; 1993, ch. 549, § 1; 1999, ch. 169, § 10; 1999, ch. 500, § 1; 2001, ch. 161, § 32; 2003, ch. 138, § 100; 2013, ch. 13, § 49; 2015, ch. 137, § 22, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 149, § 17, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018; 2019, ch. 482, § 3, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018; 2019, ch. 149, § 18, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.

57-15-14.3.
Mill levies requiring voter approval — Proceeds to general fund account. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 232, § 8.

57-15-14.4.
School district mill levies for bonded indebtedness excepted. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 608, § 19; 2013, ch. 13, § 62; repealed by 2015, ch. 137, § 38, effective July 1, 2015.

57-15-14.5.
Long-distance learning and educational technology levy. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 654, § 1; 1995, ch. 173, § 8; 1997, ch. 108, § 38; 1997, ch. 175, § 7; 2013, ch. 13, § 50; repealed by 2015, ch. 137, § 38, effective July 1, 2015.

57-15-15.
Exceptions to tax levy limitations in school districts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 608, § 22.

57-15-15.1.
Tax levy for school safety plan fund.

The school board of a school district may levy taxes for a school safety plan fund, subject to the limitations in section 57-15-14.2, when authorized to do so by a majority of the qualified electors of a school district voting upon the question at any regular or special school district election. The ballot must specify the number of mills proposed for approval and the number of years for which that approval is to apply. Approval or reauthorization by electors of levy authority under this section may not be effective for more than five taxable years.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 482, § 2, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018.

57-15-16.
Tax levy for building fund in school districts.

The governing body of any school district shall levy taxes annually for a school building fund, not in excess of twenty mills, which levy is in addition to and not restricted by the levy limitations prescribed by law, when authorized to do so by sixty percent of the qualified electors voting upon the question at a regular or special election in any school district. The governing body of the school district may create the building fund by appropriating and setting up in its budget for an amount not in excess of twenty percent of the current annual appropriation for all other purposes combined, exclusive of appropriations to pay interest and principal of the bonded debt, and not in excess of the limitations prescribed by law. If a portion or all of the proceeds of the levy have been allocated by contract to the payment of rentals upon contracts with the state board of public school education as administrator of the state school construction fund, the levy must be made annually by the governing body of the school district until the full amount of all such obligations is fully paid. Any portion of a levy for a school building fund which has not been allocated by contract with the state board of public school education must be allocated by the governing body pursuant to section 57-15-17. Upon the completion of all payments to the state school construction fund, or upon payment and cancellation or defeasance of the bonds, the levy may be discontinued at the discretion of the governing body of the school district, or upon petition of twenty percent of the qualified electors who voted in the last school election, the question of discontinuance of the levy must be submitted to the qualified electors of the school district at any regular or special election and, upon a favorable vote of sixty percent of the qualified electors voting, the levy must be discontinued. Any school district, executing a contract or lease with the state board of public school education or issuing general obligation bonds, which contract or lease or bond issue requires the maintenance of the levy provided in this section, shall immediately file a certified copy of the contract, lease, or bond issue with the county auditor or auditors of the county or counties in which the school district is located. The county auditor or auditors shall register the contract, lease, or bond issue in the bond register in substantially the manner provided in section 21-03-23. Upon the filing of the contract, lease, or bond issue with the county auditor or auditors, the school district may not discontinue the levy and the levy must automatically be included in the tax levy of the school district from year to year by the county auditor or auditors until a sufficient sum of money has been collected to pay to the state treasurer for the retirement of all obligations of the school district with the state board of public school education or to pay to the custodian of the bond sinking fund all amounts due or to become due on the bonds.

The school board of any school district, in levying taxes for a school building fund as provided for in subsection 1, shall specify on the ballot the number of mills to be levied and may in its discretion submit a specific plan for which such fund shall be used. The plan shall designate the general area intended to be served by use of such fund. The area intended to be served shall be described in the plan but need not be described in the building fund ballot. After approval of the levy and the plan no change shall be made in the purpose of expenditure of the building fund except that upon a favorable vote of sixty percent of the qualified electors residing in any specific area intended to be served, material changes may be made in such plan as it affects such area to the extent such changes do not conflict with contractual obligations incurred. The provisions of this section and of subsection 1 of section 57-15-17 in regard to the purpose for which the building fund may be expended shall not apply to expenditures for major repairs.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 7, subs. 5; 1931, ch. 252, § 1, subs. 5; 1931, ch. 297, § 2, subs. 5; R.C. 1943, § 57-1516; S.L. 1945, ch. 311, § 1; 1947, ch. 351, § 1; 1955, ch. 319, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 57-1516; S.L. 1963, ch. 203, § 2; 1975, ch. 518, § 1; 1977, ch. 184, § 3; 1983, ch. 82, § 142; 1985, ch. 235, § 99; 1993, ch. 186, § 9.

57-15-17.
Disposition of building fund tax.

All revenue accruing from appropriations or tax levies for a school district building fund, together with any amount as may be realized for building purposes from all other sources, must be placed in a separate fund known as a building fund and must:

Be deposited, held, or invested in the same manner as the sinking funds of such school district; or

Be used for the purchase of shares or securities of federal or state-chartered savings and loan associations, within the limits of federal insurance.

Moneys in the building fund may only be used for:

The construction of school district buildings and facilities;

The renovation, repair, or expansion of school district buildings and facilities;

The improvement of school district buildings, facilities, and real property;

The leasing of buildings and facilities;

The payment of rentals upon contracts with the state board of public school education;

The payment of rentals upon contracts with municipalities for career and technical education facilities financed pursuant to chapter 40-57; and

The payment of principal, premiums, and interest on bonds issued in accordance with subsection 7 of section 21-03-07.

The custodian of the funds may pay out the funds only upon order of the school board, signed by the president and the business manager of the school district. The order must recite upon its face the purpose for which payment is made.

Any moneys remaining in a building fund after the completion of payments for any school building project that has cost seventy-five percent or more of the amount in the building fund at the time of letting the contracts, must be returned to the general fund of the school district, upon the order of the school board.

The board of a school district may pay into the general fund of the school district any moneys that have remained in the building fund for ten years or more and any moneys transferred from the general fund of the school district into the building fund after March 13, 2020, and before July 1, 2020. The board may include these amounts as part of its cash on hand in making up its budget for the ensuing year. In determining what amounts have remained in the fund for ten years or more, all payments that have been made from the building fund for building purposes must be considered as having been paid from the funds first acquired. Any moneys transferred from the general fund of the school district into the building fund after March 13, 2020, and before July 1, 2020, may be transferred back into the general fund of the school district through June 30, 2021.

If collections from the taxes levied for the current budget and other income are insufficient to meet the requirements for general operating expenses, the board of a school district may transfer unobligated funds from the building fund into the general fund of the school district, provided the school district has issued certificates of indebtedness equal to fifty percent of the outstanding uncollected general fund property tax.

A board may not transfer funds from the building fund into the general fund for more than two years.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 7, subs. 5; 1931, ch. 252, § 1, subs. 5; 1931, ch. 297, § 2, subs. 5; R.C. 1943, § 57-1517; S.L. 1947, ch. 345, § 1; 1949, ch. 331, § 1; 1951, ch. 319, § 1; 1955, ch. 319, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 57-1517; S.L. 1963, ch. 203, § 3; 1977, ch. 520, § 1; 1983, ch. 82, § 143; 1985, ch. 281, § 2; 1987, ch. 679, § 1; 1993, ch. 550, § 1; 1993, ch. 551, § 1; 2003, ch. 138, § 101; 2013, ch. 13, § 51; 2015, ch. 137, § 23, effective July 1, 2015; 2021, ch. 463, § 1.

57-15-17.1.
Discontinuation of special funds — Required transfers. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 680, § 1; 1989, ch. 2, § 16; 1999, ch. 169, § 11; 1999, ch. 500, § 2; 2001, ch. 512, § 1; 2005, ch. 552, § 1; 2005, ch. 553, § 1; 2013, ch. 13, § 52; repealed by 2015, ch. 137, § 38, effective July 1, 2015.

57-15-18.
Penalty for unlawful withdrawal of building funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

57-15-18.1.
Tax levy for rental of property. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 608, § 22.

57-15-18.2.
School district levy for unemployment compensation benefits. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 608, § 22.

57-15-19.
Township tax levies.

The electors of each township have power at the annual meeting to vote to raise such sums of money for the repair and construction of roads and bridges, and for all township charges and necessary expenses as they deem expedient, within the limitations prescribed in section 57-15-20, and on the fourth Tuesday in March, or within ten days thereafter, of each year, the board of supervisors of each civil township shall levy annual taxes for the ensuing year, as voted at the annual township meeting, and the tax levy must be limited by the amount voted to be raised at such annual meeting. The electors at such annual meeting may direct the expenditure of the road tax, or a part of it, in an adjoining township under the joint direction of the boards of supervisors of the townships interested and furnishing such funds.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 57-1519; S.L. 1947, ch. 352, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 57-1519.

Cross-References.

Judgment against townships, levy to pay, see N.D.C.C. §§ 58-14-07, 58-14-08.

Parks, levy for, see N.D.C.C. §§ 58-17-02, 58-17-03.

Policemen for unincorporated townsite, levy for, see N.D.C.C. §§ 58-15-02, 58-15-06, 58-15-07.

Sidewalks and street lights in unincorporated townsite, levy for, see N.D.C.C. § 58-16-03.

57-15-19.1.
Levies for surfacing highways in unorganized townships. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1961, ch. 347, § 3.

57-15-19.2.
Township supervisors authority to transfer funds into special road fund — Limitations — Use.

The board of supervisors, at the time of the annual township meeting, upon resolution, may transfer or set aside a part or all of any funds into a special road fund, which fund must be separate and distinct from all other funds. The special road fund may not exceed the sum of one hundred thousand dollars for any one congressional township. The special road fund may be expended, at the option of the board of supervisors, for the purpose of road construction, graveling, snow removal, or surfacing.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 360, §§ 2, 3; 1953, ch. 317, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-15192; S.L. 1977, ch. 523, § 1; 1985, ch. 619, § 1; 2015, ch. 440, § 1, effective August 1, 2015.

57-15-19.3.
Funds not considered in determining budget.

The special road fund may not be considered in determining the budget of the amount to be levied for each township fiscal year, for normal tax purposes, but must be shown in such budget as a special road fund and may not be deducted therefrom as otherwise provided by law.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 360, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-15193.

57-15-19.4.
Township levy for roads.

The electors of each township at the annual meeting may levy a tax not to exceed the limitation in subsection 1 of section 57-15-20.2 for the purpose of cooperating with the county in constructing and maintaining roads and bridges that are part of the county road system and located within the township. This tax levy may be made only if notice of the question of the approval of such levy has been included with or upon the notice of the annual meeting provided for in section 58-04-01. A township levy for roads approved by qualified electors of a township under this section before January 1, 2015, may continue to be imposed for five taxable years or the period of time for which it was approved by the electors, whichever is less, under the provisions of law in effect at the time it was approved. After January 1, 2015, approval by electors of increased levy authority under this section may not be effective for more than five taxable years.

If funds from a levy under subsection 1 are not expended for purposes of cooperating with the county in constructing and maintaining roads and bridges that are part of the county road system and located within the township, the board of township supervisors may by resolution authorize the expenditure of all such funds collected and accumulated and the earnings thereon for the construction, improvement, or maintenance of other roads or for any other township purpose.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 320, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-15194; S.L. 1975, ch. 519, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 56; 1983, ch. 606, § 78; 2015, ch. 439, § 78, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-19.5.
Township funding for law enforcement — Authorization — Cooperation with other political subdivisions.

The electors of an organized township may authorize the
township to provide funding from revenues derived from its general fund levy authority for the purpose of hiring law enforcement personnel. In providing for law enforcement services, the board of supervisors may cooperate with one or more additional townships, with a city, or with the county in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 54-40.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 574, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 57; 1983, ch. 606, § 79; 2015, ch. 439, § 79, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-19.6.
Township funding for mowing or snow removal.

The budget of each township approved at the annual meeting may include provision of funding from revenues derived from the general fund levy authority of the township for the purpose of mowing or snow removal.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 575, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 58; 1983, ch. 606, § 80; 2001, ch. 513, § 1; 2015, ch. 439, § 80, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-19.7.
Township levy for emergency purposes. [Effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020]

Upon approval of a majority of electors of the township voting on the question, a township may levy the number of mills necessary for the purpose of addressing natural disasters or other emergency conditions.

The levy under this section may be made only if notice of the question of the approval of the levy has been included with the notice of the annual or special meeting provided in chapter 58-04.

Approval by the electors of increased levy authority under this section may not be effective for more than five taxable years.

Source:

2021, ch. 464, § 1, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020.

57-15-20.
Township general fund levy — Approval of increased general fund levy authority.

The general fund levy in a civil township, exclusive of levies to pay interest on any bonded debt and to provide a sinking fund to pay and discharge the principal of bonded debt at maturity, may not exceed the amount produced by a levy of eighteen mills on the dollar of the taxable valuation of property in the township.

Upon approval of a majority of electors of the township voting on the question, a civil township general fund levy may be increased by an additional amount not to exceed the amount produced by a levy of eighteen mills on the dollar of the taxable valuation of property in the township. The increased levy under this section may be made only if notice of the question of the approval of such levy has been included with or upon the notice of the annual meeting provided for in section 58-04-01. An excess levy approved by electors of a township under chapter 57-17 before January 1, 2015, may continue to be imposed for five taxable years or the period of time for which it was approved by the electors, whichever is less, under the provisions of law in effect at the time it was approved. After January 1, 2015, approval by electors of increased levy authority under this section may not be effective for more than five taxable years.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 57-1520; S.L. 1947, ch. 360, § 1; 1953, ch. 316, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 57-1520; S.L. 1983, ch. 593, § 59; 2015, ch. 439, § 81, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Cross-References.

Debt void if entailing tax beyond legal rate, see N.D.C.C. § 57-45-07.

57-15-20.1.
Excess levies in townships — Authorization for more than one year.

The board of township supervisors may submit the question of authorizing an excess levy for not to exceed a total of five years, provided the notice of election and the ballot upon which the authorization for the excess levy is submitted both contain the specific years for which such authorization is sought. Upon approval by the voters as provided in section 57-17-05, such excess levy may be levied for the years specified in the ballot.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 543, § 1.

57-15-20.2.
Exceptions to tax levy limitations in townships. [Effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020]

The tax levy limitations specified in section 57-15-20 do not apply to the following mill levies, which are expressed in mills per dollar of taxable valuation of property in the township:

A township levying a tax for the purpose of cooperating with the county in constructing and maintaining roads and bridges that are part of the county road system and located within the township in accordance with section 57-15-19.4 may levy a tax not exceeding five mills.

A township levying a tax for airport purposes in accordance with section 2-06-15 may levy a tax not exceeding four mills.

A township levying a tax for special assessment districts in accordance with chapter 58-18.

A township levying tax for emergency purposes in accordance with section 57-15-19.7.

Tax levy or mill levy limitations do not apply to any statute which expressly provides that taxes authorized to be levied therein are not subject to mill levy limitations provided by law.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 606, § 56; 1985, ch. 82, § 140; 2001, ch. 246, § 16; 2001, ch. 511, § 2; 2001, ch. 513, § 2; 2001, ch. 553, § 1; 2003, ch. 95, § 4; 2003, ch. 96, § 18; 2015, ch. 439, § 82, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014; 2021, ch. 464, 2021, ch. 464, § 2, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020, effective January 1, 2021.

57-15-20.3.
Township levy for port purposes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 95, § 6; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-20.4.
Township levy for commerce authority purposes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 96, § 19; Repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-21.
Tax levies in unorganized townships.

The board of county commissioners has the same jurisdiction in an unorganized township as the board of township supervisors has in an organized township. Such board may levy taxes in an unorganized township for road and bridge purposes and shall make such levy on the fourth Tuesday in July in each year, or within ten days thereafter. Such levy has no relation to nor effect upon the county taxes for any purpose levied by the board of county commissioners.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 9; 1933, ch. 250, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-1521; S.L. 1947, ch. 354, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 57-1521.

57-15-22.
Tax levy limitations in unorganized townships.

The total tax levied by the board of county commissioners in any unorganized township for the construction, maintenance, and improvement of any roads and bridges may not exceed eighteen mills on the dollar of the taxable valuation of the township or the amount in dollars that the township would have been entitled to levy under section 57-15-01.1 if the township had remained organized, but this does not prohibit the levy of general county road and bridge taxes in such unorganized township.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 9; 1933, ch. 250, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 57-1522; S.L. 1945, ch. 304, § 1; 1947, ch. 361, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 57-1522; S.L. 1961, ch. 347, § 1; 1981, ch. 576, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 60; 1999, ch. 102, § 3.

57-15-22.1.
Board of county commissioners may transfer unexpended balance in road and bridge fund in unorganized townships.

The board of county commissioners, by resolution, may transfer any unexpended balance of the revenues produced under section 57-15-22 in any unorganized township to a special road and bridge fund to the credit of such unorganized township. Such special road and bridge fund may not be taken into consideration in determining the budget for the amount to be levied for road and bridge purposes in an unorganized township for the current fiscal year.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 361, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 57-15221; S.L. 1961, ch. 347, § 2; 1981, ch. 577, § 1.

57-15-22.2.
Township legal contingency funding.

The board of township supervisors of an organized township or the board of county commissioners for an unorganized township, may provide funding from revenue derived from the general fund levy authority for the township levy on property within the township for a legal contingency expenditure. Funding authorized under this section may be used only for purposes of expenses of legal actions authorized or entered into by the governing body of the township or the county, on behalf of unorganized townships. A levy under this section authorized by electors of an organized or unorganized township before January 1, 2015, remains effective for five taxable years or the period of time for which it was approved by the electors, whichever is less. Upon expiration of any mill levy authorized by electors of an organized or unorganized township before January 1, 2015, under this section, the governing body of the township or county may, by resolution, transfer any unobligated balance in the legal contingency fund to the general fund of the township or county.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 609, § 1; 1985, ch. 82, § 141; 1985, ch. 235, § 100; 2015, ch. 439, § 83, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

57-15-23.
Per capita school tax — Levy — Apportionment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 528, § 24.

57-15-24.
County mill levy for schools. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 198, § 18.

57-15-25.
County equalization fund — How constituted. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.